test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-5-itîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 2Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-isiyan # as you said thus to me, as you said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kî-itat # as you said thus to him/her, as you said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-isiyâhk # as you said thus to us, as you said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-itacik # as you said thus to them, as you said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimat # as you said thus to another/others, as you said thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-isiyan # as you said thus to me, as you said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-kî-itisk # as he/she said thus to you, as he/she said thus about you
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-isiyâhk # as you said thus to us, as you said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-kî-itikoyâhk # as you said thus to us, as you said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-isiyamiht # as you said thus to us, as you said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-kî-itikoyahk # as he/she said thus to you and us, as he/she said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-ititahk # as he/she said thus to you and us, as he/she said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-kî-itikoyîk # as he/she said thus to you all, as he/she said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-ititîk # as he/she said thus to you all, as he/she said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-itacik # as you said thus to them, as you said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimat # as you said thus to another/others, as you said thus about another/others
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimât # as he/she said thus to yet another/others, as he/she said thus about yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-kî-ititâhk # as we said thus to you, as we said thus about you
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-kî-itâyâhk # as we said thus to him/her, as we said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-itakiht # as we said thus to him/her, as we said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-kî-ititâhk # as we said thus to you all, as we said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-kî-itâyâhkwâw # as we said thus to them, as we said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-itakihcik # as we said thus to them, as we said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimâyâhk # as we said thus to another/others, as we said thus about another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-kî-itâyahk # as we and you said thus to him/her, as we and you said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-itahk # as we and you said thus to him/her, as we and you said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-kî-itâyahkwâw # as we and you said thus to them, as we and you said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-itahkwâw # as we and you said thus to them, as we and you said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimâyahk # as we and you said thus to another/others, as we and you said thus about another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-kî-isiyîk # as you all said thus to me, as you all said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-kî-itâyîk # as you all said thus to him/her, as you all said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-kî-isiyâhk # as you all said thus to us, as you all said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-kî-itâyîkwâw # as you all said thus to them, as you all said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-itâyîkok # as you all said thus to them, as you all said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimâyîk # as you all said thus to another/others, as you all said thus about another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-kî-isitwâw, î-kî-isicik] # as they said thus to me, as they said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kî-itiskwâw # as they said thus to you, as they said thus about you
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kî-itikoyâhkwâw # as they said thus to us, as they said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-isiyamihcik # as they said thus to us, as they said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kî-itikoyahkwâw # as they said thus to you and us, as they said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-ititahkwâw # as they said thus to you and us, as they said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kî-itikoyîkwâw # as they said thus to you all, as they said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-ititîkwâw # as they said thus to you all, as they said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itâcik # as they said thus to another/others, as they said thus about another/others
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimâcik # as they said thus to yet another/others, as they said thus about yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-itimit # as another/others said thus to me, as another/others said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-itimisk # as another/others said thus to you, as another/others said thus about you
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-itikot # as another/others said thus to him/her, as another/others said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-itikoyâhk # as another/others said thus to us, as another/others said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-itikoyahk # as another/others said thus to you and us, as another/others said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-itikoyîk # as another/others said thus to you all, as another/others said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-itikocik # as another/others said thus to them, as another/others said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-itâthit # as another/others said thus to yet another/others, as another/others said thus about yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itikothit # as yet another/others said thus to another/others, as yet another/others said thus about another/others

      # X
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-itikawiyân # as someone said thus to me, as someone said thus about me
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-itikawiyan # as someone said thus to you, as someone said thus about you
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-itiht # as someone said thus to him/her, as someone said thus about him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-itikawiyâhk # as someone said thus to us, as someone said thus about us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-itikawiyahk # as someone said thus to you and us, as someone said thus about you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-itikawiyîk # as someone said thus to you all, as someone said thus about you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-itihcik # as someone said thus to them, as someone said thus about them
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itimiht # as someone said thus to another/others, as someone said thus about another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-itikoyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-itikoyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-itikot
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-itikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-itikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-itikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-itikocik
      PV/î+PV/ki+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-itikothit
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-ititin # I am going to say thus to you, I am going to say thus about you
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-itâw # I am going to say thus to him/her, I am going to say thus about him/her
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-ititinâwâw # I am going to say thus to you all, I am going to say thus about you all
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-itâwak # I am going to say thus to them, I am going to say thus about them
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-itimâwa # I am going to say thus to another/others, I am going to say thus about another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-isin # you are going to say thus to me, you are going to say thus about me
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-itâw # you are going to say thus to him/her, you are going to say thus about him/her
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-isinân # you are going to say thus to us, you are going to say thus about us
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-itâwak # you are going to say thus to them, you are going to say thus about them
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-itimâwa # you are going to say thus to another/others, you are going to say thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-isin # you are going to say thus to me, you are going to say thus about me
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-itik # he/she is going to say thus to you, he/she is going to say thus about you
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-isinân # you are going to say thus to us, you are going to say thus about us
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-itikonaw # he/she is going to say thus to you and us, he/she is going to say thus about you and us
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-itikowâw # he/she is going to say thus to you all, he/she is going to say thus about you all
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-itâwak # you are going to say thus to them, you are going to say thus about them
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-itimâwa # you are going to say thus to another/others, you are going to say thus about another/others
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-itimîw # he/she is going to say thus to yet another/others, he/she is going to say thus about yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwî-ititinân # we are going to say thus to you, we are going to say thus about you
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwî-itânân # we are going to say thus to him/her, we are going to say thus about him/her
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwî-ititinân # we are going to say thus to you all, we are going to say thus about you all
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwî-itânânak # we are going to say thus to them, we are going to say thus about them
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwî-itimânâna # we are going to say thus to another/others, we are going to say thus about another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwî-itânaw # we and you are going to say thus to him/her, we and you are going to say thus about him/her
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwî-itânawak # we and you are going to say thus to them, we and you are going to say thus about them
      PV/wi+itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-itimânawa # we and you are going to say thus to another/others, we and you are going to say thus about another/others
